Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2923
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Convicted Sex Offender Act:

(1) Aftercare treatment program shall mean any public or private facility or service which offers treatment on an outpatient basis or in a minimally restricted setting, which treatment is appropriate for a convicted sex offender after he or she has successfully completed an inpatient treatment program operated by the Department of Health and Human Services; and

(2) Convicted sex offender shall mean a person who is convicted of sexual assault in the first degree as provided in section 28-319, sexual assault in the second degree as provided in section 28-320, sexual assault of a child in the second or third degree as provided in section 28-320.01, sexual assault of a child in the first degree as provided in section 28-319.01, incest as provided in section 28-703, or attempt to commit sexual assault in the first degree pursuant to section 28-201 and sentenced to a term of imprisonment in a Department of Correctional Services adult correctional facility.

Laws 1992, LB 523, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 78;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 16.